Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE C. PROSECUTING ATTORNEYS

CHAPTER 43. DISTRICT ATTORNEYS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 43.002. BOND; COUNTY RISK MANAGEMENT POOL. (a) Before assuming the duties of the office and except as provided by Subsection (c) or (d), a district attorney must give a bond that:

(1) is payable to the governor;

(2) is in the sum of $5,000;

(3) has two or more good and sufficient sureties;

(4) is approved by the district judge; and

(5) is conditioned that the district attorney will, in the manner prescribed by law, faithfully pay over all money that he collects or that comes into his hands for the state or a county.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), each district attorney's bond shall be deposited in the office of the comptroller of public accounts.

(c) Instead of the bond required under Subsection (a), a district attorney may obtain coverage from a county government risk management pool created under Chapter 119, Local Government Code. Coverage obtained under the pool must be in the same amount and satisfy the same bond conditions otherwise required by this section.

(d) A district attorney is not required to execute the bond required under Subsection (a) and may perform the duties of office if the commissioners court of each county in the district by order authorizes the county to self-insure against losses that would have been covered by the bond. An order adopted by a commissioners court under this subsection shall be kept and recorded by the county clerk.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 439 (S.B. 1243), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 69 (S.B. 265), Sec. 1, eff. May 18, 2013.

Sec. 43.003. FAILURE TO ATTEND COURT. (a) If a district attorney fails to attend any term of the district court of a county in the district, the district clerk shall certify that failure to the comptroller of public accounts. Unless a satisfactory reason for the failure is shown to the comptroller, the district attorney may not receive salary for the time the district attorney failed to attend.

(b) Subsection (a) does not apply to a district attorney who complies with Section 41.015.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 425 (S.B. 910), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 43.004. EXPENSES. (a) A district attorney engaged in the discharge of official duties in a county other than the district attorney's county of residence is entitled to traveling and other necessary expenses, as provided by Chapter 660.

(b) A district attorney is entitled to receive from the state the actual and necessary postage, telegraph, and telephone expenses incurred in the discharge of official duties.

(c) The expenses shall be paid by the state on a sworn itemized account showing the expenses.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(105), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER B. PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO SPECIFIC DISTRICTS

Sec. 43.101. 1ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of Sabine and San Augustine counties elect a district attorney for the 1st Judicial District who represents the state in that district court only in those counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 739, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 43.102. 2ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 2nd Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.104. 8TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of Delta, Franklin, and Hopkins counties elect a district attorney for the 8th Judicial District who represents the state in that district only in those counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 11(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 917, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 43.105. 9TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Montgomery County elect a district attorney for the 9th Judicial District who represents the state in that district court only in that county. The district attorney also acts as district attorney for the 410th and 457th Judicial Districts.

(b) The district attorney shall represent the state in misdemeanor criminal cases pending in the district and inferior courts of the county.

(c) The district attorney, with the approval of the Commissioners Court of Montgomery County, may appoint the assistant district attorneys, investigators, secretaries, and other employees necessary to carry out the duties of the office of district attorney.

(d) An investigator appointed by the district attorney is not required to be a licensed attorney.

(e) The salary of each employee of the district attorney is fixed by the Commissioners Court of Montgomery County. The district attorney, assistant district attorneys, and investigators employed by the district attorney may be allowed the actual and necessary travel expenses incident to carrying out the duties of the district attorney, subject to the approval of the district attorney. This subsection does not apply to the portion of compensation or travel expenses paid by the state to the district attorney or his employees.

(f) The salary and expenses of the employees of the district attorney must be paid by the county at the regular pay period of the county from the officers' salary fund of the county, the general fund of the county, or both, at the discretion of the commissioners court.

(g) The compensation paid by the county to an employee of the district attorney or set for a position on the staff of the district attorney may not be less than the compensation paid by the county to the person or set for the position on June 14, 1973.

(h) The commissioners court may accept gifts and grants from an individual, partnership, corporation, trust, foundation, association, or political subdivision to finance adequate and effective prosecution, crime prevention, or rehabilitation programs in the county or district approved and administered by the district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 60, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 565, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 5, eff. Jan. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 911, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 6.01, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 43.107. 18TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 18th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.108. 21ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Washington County elect a district attorney for the 21st Judicial District who represents the state in that district court only in that county.

(b) The district attorney also represents the state and performs the duties of district attorney before the 335th District Court in Washington County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.50(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 665, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 6.02, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 43.110. 23RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Matagorda County elect a district attorney for the 23rd Judicial District who represents the state in that district court only in that county.

(b) The district attorney also represents the state and performs the duties of district attorney before all the district courts in Matagorda County.

(c) The commissioners courts of the counties comprising the district may supplement the salary of the district attorney so that the total annual salary of the district attorney is not less than $12,000. The supplemental salary must be paid by each county proportionately according to the population of each county. The supplemental salary must be paid from the officers' salary funds of the counties, if those funds are adequate. If the officers' salary fund of a county is inadequate, the commissioners court shall transfer the necessary amount from the general fund of the county to the officers' salary fund.

(d) The district attorney also handles all:

(1) felony and misdemeanor criminal matters in all of the courts in Matagorda County; and

(2) juvenile matters under Title 3, Family Code, in all of the courts in Matagorda County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 457, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 43.111. 24TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of DeWitt, Goliad, and Refugio counties elect a district attorney for the 24th Judicial District who represents the state in that district court only in those counties.

(b) The district attorney also represents the state in all cases before the 135th Judicial District Court in DeWitt, Goliad, and Refugio counties.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 15.03(2), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 15.03(2), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 43.113. 26TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 26th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.114. 27TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Bell County elect a district attorney for the 27th Judicial District who represents the state in the district courts having jurisdiction in that county.

(b) An investigator appointed by the district attorney is not required to be a licensed attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 43.115. 29TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 29th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) The commissioners court of a county in the 29th Judicial District may accept gifts and grants from any political subdivision to finance adequate and effective prosecution programs within the county or district. A municipality in the county or district may allocate or grant money, in amounts approved by the governing body of the municipality, for the support and maintenance of an effective prosecution program.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.117. 31ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 31st Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 91, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993.

Sec. 43.118. 32ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 32nd Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.119. 33RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of Blanco, Burnet, Llano, and San Saba Counties elect a district attorney for the 33rd and 424th Judicial Districts.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.120. 34TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Culberson, Hudspeth, and El Paso counties elect a district attorney for the 34th Judicial District.

(b) The district attorney for the 34th Judicial District also acts as district attorney for the 41st, 65th, 120th, and 171st judicial districts, the 394th Judicial District in Culberson and Hudspeth counties, and represents the state in all criminal cases before every district court having jurisdiction in El Paso County.

(c) The district attorney represents the state in all criminal cases pending in the inferior courts having jurisdiction in El Paso County.

(d) The commissioners courts of Culberson and Hudspeth Counties shall each pay to El Paso County the budgeted prosecution costs, which may not exceed a total of $90,000 for Culberson and Hudspeth Counties per fiscal year, for the preparation and conduct of criminal affairs of the district attorney's office, including compensation for assistants and other employees of the district attorney, applicable to their respective county. Each year the district attorney's office shall:

(1) prepare a budget and financial statement for the upcoming fiscal year; and

(2) file the budget and financial statement with the commissioners courts of Hudspeth and Culberson Counties.

(d-1) The budget and financial statement required by Subsection (d) must contain:

(1) the budgeted prosecution costs for Culberson and Hudspeth Counties, with the costs for each county listed separately; and

(2) any additional information considered appropriate by the district attorney or required by the commissioners court of Culberson or Hudspeth County.

(d-2) Hudspeth and Culberson Counties shall remit one-fourth of the budgeted prosecution costs applicable to the respective county to El Paso County not later than the last day of each fiscal quarter.

(e) For the purpose of conducting his office, the district attorney may appoint two first assistant district attorneys, or one first assistant district attorney and one first assistant administrative district attorney, and the other assistant district attorneys that are necessary to the proper performance of the district attorney's duties.

(f) El Paso County is responsible for managing the funds expended by the district attorney for the preparation and conduct of criminal affairs of the district attorney's office, including funds to compensate assistants and other employees of the district attorney. Hudspeth and Culberson Counties shall remit one-fourth of the budgeted funds to El Paso County not later than the last day of each fiscal quarter. The Commissioners Court of El Paso County must approve the number of assistants and other employees appointed by the district attorney and the amount of compensation of those employees.

(g) Nothing in this section prevents El Paso County from entering into an interlocal agreement with Culberson or Hudspeth County in lieu of budgeting costs as provided by this section or Section 140.003, Local Government Code. An interlocal agreement under this subsection may not exceed $90,000 per fiscal year.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 493, Sec. 1, eff. Oct. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 13(a), eff. October 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.121. 35TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 35th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1027, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

(d) The district attorney also performs the duties of the county attorney of Brown County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.52(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 892, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 16.01(22), eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1027, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 43.122. 36TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of San Patricio County elect a district attorney for the 36th Judicial District who represents the state in that district court only in that county. In addition to exercising the duties and authority conferred on district attorneys by general law, the district attorney represents the state in all criminal cases in the district courts in that county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 3.09(a), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 43.123. 38TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 38th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) Expired.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 6.03(a), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 43.124. 39TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 39th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.1243. 42ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Coleman County elect a district attorney for the 42nd Judicial District who represents the state in that district court only in Coleman County.

(b) The Coleman County district attorney shall perform all of the duties in Coleman County required by district attorneys by general law and shall represent the state in criminal cases pending in the district court of the county. The district attorney has control of any case heard on habeas corpus before any civil district or criminal court of the county.

(c) The district attorney has all of the powers, duties, and privileges in Coleman County relating to criminal matters for and on behalf of the state that are conferred on district attorneys in other counties and districts.

(d) The comptroller of public accounts shall pay directly to the district attorney of Coleman County a salary equal to the salary authorized by the General Appropriations Act for a district attorney. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments on the first day of each month.

(e) The Commissioners Court of Coleman County may supplement the district attorney's salary in an amount to be set by the commissioners court.

(f) The district attorney shall collect the fees, commissions, and perquisites that are provided by law for similar services rendered by district or county attorneys.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 43.125. 43RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 43rd Judicial District elect a district attorney who represents the state in all cases before the 43rd and 415th district courts.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1306, Sec. 3(c), eff. Sept. 1, 2005.

Sec. 43.126. 46TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 46th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.127. 47TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Armstrong and Potter counties elect a district attorney for the 47th Judicial District who represents the state in that district court only in those counties.

(b) The district attorney of the 47th Judicial District also acts as the district attorney for the 108th Judicial District.

(c) The district attorney also represents the state in all criminal cases before the district courts of Potter and Armstrong counties.

(d) The number of assistants and other office personnel employed by the district attorney and the compensation of the personnel are subject to the approval of the Commissioners Court of Potter County.

(e) The Commissioners Court of Potter County may pay the salaries of the office personnel of the district attorney from the officers' salary fund, the general fund, any other available fund, or any combination of those funds.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.128. 49TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 49th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) The district attorney represents the state in all criminal cases in Webb County.

(c) The district attorney also represents the state in the 111th District Court in all criminal cases and in all other matters in which the state is a party.

(d) Repealed by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1045, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

(e) The commissioners court of any county in the district may provide the salary of any member of the district attorney's staff and may prescribe as a qualification for retaining a job that a member of the staff reside in the county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1045, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 43.129. 50TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 50th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.130. 51ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 51st Judicial District elect a district attorney who represents the state in all criminal and habeas corpus cases in that district court.

(b) The district attorney of the 51st Judicial District may request the district attorney of the 119th Judicial District to assist in the trial of a criminal or habeas corpus case in Tom Green County. The district attorney of the 51st Judicial District has absolute control and management of those cases.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.131. 52ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 52nd Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.132. 53RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 53rd Judicial District elect a district attorney. In addition to performing the other duties provided by law for district attorneys, the district attorney represents the state in all criminal cases before all the district courts of Travis County.

(b) The Commissioners Court of Travis County may supplement the salaries paid by the state to the assistant district attorneys and to the district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.53, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 819, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 43.133. 63RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 63rd Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) The district attorney for the 63rd Judicial District also acts as district attorney for the 83rd Judicial District in Terrell and Val Verde counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1337, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 43.134. 64TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Hale County elect a district attorney for the 64th Judicial District who represents the state in that district court only in Hale County.

(b) The district attorney also represents the state in all criminal cases before the county court and the justice courts in Hale County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 198, Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 787 (S.B. 1166), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1103 (H.B. 4833), Sec. 16(a), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 43.135. 66TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 66th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.136. 69TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 69th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) Any commissioners court in the district may supplement the state salary of the district attorney in an amount set by the commissioners court. In addition, a commissioners court may compensate the district attorney for the prosecution of misdemeanors in the manner and amount determined by the commissioners court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.54(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 43.137. 70TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 70th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) The district attorney of the 70th Judicial District shall also act as district attorney for the 161st Judicial District.

(c) In addition to exercising the duties and authority conferred on district attorneys by general law, the district attorney represents the state in the district and inferior courts in Ector County in all criminal cases, juvenile matters under Title 3, Family Code, and matters involving children's protective services.

(d) The district attorney has no power, duty, or privilege in any civil matter, other than civil asset forfeiture and civil bond forfeiture matters.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 14.01, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 43.138. 76TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of Titus and Camp counties elect a district attorney for the 76th Judicial District who represents the state in all matters pending before the district court in those counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.139. 79TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 79th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) The commissioners courts of the counties comprising the district may supplement the state salary of the district attorney in the amount of $2,500 a year. The commissioners court of each county in the district shall pay a proportionate share of the supplemental salary according to the population of the county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.140. 81ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 81st Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.141. 83RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Brewster, Jeff Davis, Pecos, and Presidio counties elect a district attorney for the 83rd Judicial District.

(b) The district attorney for the 83rd district also acts as district attorney for the 394th Judicial District in Brewster, Jeff Davis, and Presidio counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 24, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 43.142. 84TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Hansford and Hutchinson counties elect a district attorney for the 84th Judicial District who represents the state in that district court only in those counties.

(b) The district attorney may appoint an assistant district attorney with the approval of the commissioners courts of the counties comprising the district.

(c) The salary and expenses of the assistant district attorney shall be paid by the counties comprising the district in proportion to the population of the counties. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments. Expense claims shall be paid at the end of each month on the approval of the district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.143. 85TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 85th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) The district attorney, with the approval of the Commissioners Court of Brazos County, may appoint the assistant district attorneys, investigators, stenographers, secretaries, clerks, and other personnel that he considers necessary to carry out the duties of the office.

(c) An investigator appointed by the district attorney must take the constitutional oath of office when appointed.

(d) The Commissioners Court of Brazos County may accept gifts and grants from any individual, partnership, corporation, trust, foundation, association, or political subdivision for the purpose of financing adequate and effective prosecution, crime prevention, or rehabilitation programs within the county or district that are approved by the district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.144. 88TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of Hardin County elect a district attorney for the 88th Judicial District. The district attorney acts as district attorney in Hardin County only.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1352, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 43.145. 90TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 90th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.146. 97TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 97th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) The district attorney, with the approval of the commissioners courts of the counties comprising the district, may appoint assistants, investigators, and office personnel as he considers necessary.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.147. 100TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 100th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.148. 105TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Nueces County elect a district attorney for the 105th Judicial District who has the same powers and duties as other district attorneys and serves all the district, county, and justice courts of Nueces County.

(b) The district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district, county, and justice courts of Nueces County and shall represent the state in criminal cases pending in those courts. The district attorney has control of any case heard on petition of writ of habeas corpus before any district or inferior court in the district.

(c) The commissioners court of Nueces County may supplement the state salary of the district attorney. The amount of the supplement may not exceed $12,000 a year. The supplemental salary may be paid from the officers' salary fund of the county. If that fund is inadequate, the commissioners court may transfer the necessary funds from the general fund of the county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 387, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.149. 106TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 106th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.150. 109TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of Crane and Winkler counties elect a district attorney for the 109th Judicial District who represents the state in that district court only in those counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 318 (H.B. 2288), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.151. 110TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 110th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) The commissioners court of Briscoe or Dickens County may supplement the state salary of the district attorney in an amount set by the commissioners court. The commissioners court may pay the supplemental salary from the officers' salary fund, the general fund, any other available fund, or any combination of those funds.

(c) If there is no county attorney in Briscoe, Dickens, Floyd, or Motley County, the district attorney may perform the duties of county attorney for the county. The commissioners court of the county in which the district attorney is performing the duties of county attorney may compensate the district attorney for the prosecution of misdemeanors in the county. The commissioners court shall determine the amount of the compensation and the manner of its payment.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 936, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1987; Acts 1990, 71st Leg., 6th C.S., ch. 18, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1990.

Sec. 43.152. 112TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 112th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 80 (S.B. 441), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 43.153. 118TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 118th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) The district attorney also represents the state in all criminal cases before the County Court of Glasscock County.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.154. 119TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 119th Judicial District elect a district attorney who represents the state in all criminal and habeas corpus cases in that district court.

(b) The district attorney of the 119th Judicial District may request the district attorney of the 51st Judicial District to assist in the trial of a criminal or habeas corpus case before the 119th District Court. The district attorney of the 119th Judicial District has absolute control and management of those cases.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.155. 123RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of Shelby County elect a district attorney for the 123rd Judicial District who represents the state in that district only in that county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 6, eff. Jan. 1, 1993.

Sec. 43.156. 132ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 132nd Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 , Sec. 2.08(b), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1182 (S.B. 1139), Sec. 2.08(b), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 43.157. 142ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 142nd Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) The district attorney represents the state in criminal cases in all district and inferior courts other than municipal courts having jurisdiction in Midland County.

(c) The district attorney has all of the powers, duties, and privileges conferred by law on district and prosecuting attorneys relating to:

(1) the prosecution of felony and misdemeanor criminal cases;

(2) matters directly relating to criminal cases, including asset and bond forfeitures; and

(3) delinquent children, children in need of supervision, and protective orders under Chapter 71, Family Code.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 811, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 465, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 43.158. 143RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 143rd Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.159. 145TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 145th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) The district attorney, with the approval of the Commissioners Court of Nacogdoches County, may appoint the assistant district attorneys, investigators, and stenographers that are necessary to carry out the duties of the office.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.161. 156TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of Bee, Live Oak, and McMullen counties elect a district attorney for the 156th Judicial District who represents the state in that district court only in those counties. In addition to exercising the duties and authority conferred on district attorneys by general law, the district attorney shall also represent the state in all criminal cases in the district courts in those counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 1, eff. April 25, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 751, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 43.162. 159TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 159th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) Subject to the approval of the Commissioners Court of Angelina County, the district attorney may appoint investigators, court reporters, stenographers, secretaries, and other employees as he considers adequate and necessary to conduct the affairs of the office.

(c) An investigator appointed by the district attorney must take the constitutional oath of office when appointed.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.163. 173RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Henderson County elect a district attorney for the 173rd Judicial District who represents the state in all cases in the district courts having jurisdiction in that county.

(b) The district attorney, with the approval of the Commissioners Court of Henderson County, may appoint assistants, investigators, and office personnel as he considers necessary.

(c) An investigator appointed by the district attorney must take the constitutional oath of office when appointed.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.164. 196TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 196th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.165. 198TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 198th Judicial District elect a district attorney who represents the state in all matters before that district court.

(b) The district attorney of the 198th Judicial District and the district attorneys of the other judicial districts within that district shall assist each other in the conduct of their duties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.166. 216TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 216th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.167. 220TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 220th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.168. 229TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 229th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.169. 235TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 235th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.170. 253RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Liberty County elect a district attorney for the 253rd Judicial District who represents the state in that district only in that county and in all cases before the 75th District Court.

(b) The Commissioners Court of Liberty County may supplement the state salary of the district attorney. The supplemental compensation may not exceed $5,000 a year. The supplemental compensation must be paid from the officers' salary fund of the county. If the officers' salary fund of a county is not adequate, the commissioners court may transfer the necessary amount from the general fund of the county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 734 (H.B. 2569), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2009.

Sec. 43.171. 258TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Trinity County elect a district attorney for the 258th Judicial District who represents the state in that district court only in that county.

(b) The district attorney of the 258th Judicial District also acts as district attorney for the 411th Judicial District in Trinity County.

(c) Expired.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 60, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 655, Sec. 1.02, 2.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 122, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1990; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 6, eff. Jan. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1257, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 43.172. 259TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 259th Judicial District elect a district attorney. In addition to exercising the duties and authority provided by general law for district attorneys, the district attorney represents the state in all felony cases before the 259th District Court in Jones and Shackelford counties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.173. 266TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 266th Judicial District elect a district attorney who represents the state in all cases before that district court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.174. 271ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 271st Judicial District elect a district attorney who represents the state in all cases before that district court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.175. 286TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 286th Judicial District elect a district attorney who represents the state in all cases before that district court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.176. 287TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 287th Judicial District elect a district attorney who represents the state in all cases before that district court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.177. 293RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 293rd Judicial District elect a district attorney who represents the state in all cases before that district court.

(b) The commissioners court of one or more of the counties comprising the district may supplement the state salary of the district attorney. The commissioners court of each county may set the amount of supplemental compensation paid by that county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 286, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1989.

Sec. 43.1775. 329TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 329th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) The district attorney represents the state and performs the duties of prosecutor in all criminal matters before the district and county courts in Wharton County.

(c) At the request of the county attorney, the district attorney may assist the county attorney in the prosecution of juvenile cases under Title 3, Family Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 457, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 477, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 51, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 43.1777. 344TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 344th Judicial District elect a district attorney who represents the state in cases before the district courts of Chambers County.

(b) The Commissioners Court of Chambers County may supplement the state salary of the district attorney. The supplemental compensation may not exceed $5,000 a year.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 734 (H.B. 2569), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2009.

Sec. 43.178. 349TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Houston County elect a district attorney for the 349th Judicial District who represents the state in all cases before that district court only in that county.

(b) The district attorney, with the approval of the Commissioners Court of Houston County, may appoint the necessary assistants, investigators, and personnel for the office.

(c) The salaries of the staff of the district attorney and the operating expenses of the office of the district attorney must be paid from the general fund of the county.

(d) An investigator appointed by the district attorney must take the constitutional oath of office.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 43.179. 355TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 355th Judicial District elect a district attorney who represents the state in all cases before that district court.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.56, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 43.180. HARRIS COUNTY DISTRICT ATTORNEY. (a) The voters of Harris County elect a district attorney.

(b) The district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district courts of Harris County. The district attorney shall represent the state in criminal cases pending in the district and inferior courts of the county. The district attorney has control of any case heard on habeas corpus before any civil district court or criminal court of the county.

(c) The district attorney has all the powers, duties, and privileges in Harris County relating to criminal matters for and in behalf of the state that are conferred on district attorneys in the various counties and districts.

(d) The allocation formerly made under Section 6(a), Chapter 465, Acts of the 44th Legislature, 2nd Called Session, 1935 (Article 3912e, Vernon's Texas Civil Statutes), now codified as Section 154.008, Local Government Code, to the criminal district attorney of Harris County shall be made and allocated on the same basis to the district attorney in the General Appropriations Act.

(e) The Commissioners Court of Harris County shall pay the district attorney a salary of not less than $35,000 a year. The county salary shall be paid in equal biweekly installments.

(f) At the option of the district attorney, the comptroller of public accounts shall pay directly to the district attorney a salary equal to the salary authorized by the General Appropriations Act for a district attorney. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments on the first day of each month. If the district attorney receives a salary from the state under this subsection, the amount of the salary shall be deducted from the amount to be paid to Harris County under Subchapter C, Chapter 41. The total compensation of the district attorney from all sources may not be less than the salary of the district attorney paid by the county in effect on August 29, 1977.

(g) The district attorney may not engage in the private practice of law whether or not he is compensated for his services.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 37, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 560), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 43.181. 268TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of the 268th Judicial District elect a district attorney.

(b) The district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district courts in Fort Bend County and, unless otherwise provided by law, shall represent the state in all felony and misdemeanor criminal cases and matters directly relating to criminal cases in all the courts of the county, including any asset forfeitures related to criminal activities, and bond forfeiture proceedings through judgment other than collection of a final judgment on a bond forfeiture.

(c) The district attorney has the powers, duties, and privileges in Fort Bend County relating to family law and juvenile matters, except as provided by Subsection (f-1), protective orders under Title 4, Family Code, orders under Chapter 159, Family Code, and proceedings under Title 3, Family Code.

(d) The district attorney has no power, duty, or privilege in Fort Bend County relating to a quo warranto or removal from office proceeding, except that if the county attorney fails or refuses to act in a removal case, the district attorney has the power, duty, and privilege to bring a removal from office action or a quo warranto proceeding.

(e) Except as provided by Subsections (c) and (g), the district attorney has no power, duty, or privilege to represent this state, Fort Bend County, or the officials of Fort Bend County in any civil matter pending before any court.

(f) Except as provided by the Code of Criminal Procedure, the district attorney has no power, duty, or privilege in Fort Bend County relating to a civil commitment matter under Subtitle C, Title 7, Health and Safety Code, for and on behalf of the state.

(f-1) The district attorney has no power, duty, or privilege in Fort Bend County relating to a matter involving children's protective services.

(g) At the request of the county attorney, the district attorney may assist the county attorney in civil matters in Fort Bend County.

(h) The district attorney shall, with the approval of the commissioners court, appoint the assistant district attorneys and other assistants necessary to the proper performance of the district attorney's duties. The commissioners court shall set the salary of an assistant to the district attorney.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1099, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 7.30, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 659 (H.B. 3263), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 43.1815. 369TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Leon County elect a district attorney for the 369th Judicial District who represents the state in that district court only in Leon County.

(b) The district attorney of the 369th Judicial District also represents the state in all criminal and civil actions in which the state is interested that arise in the 87th Judicial District in Leon County.

(c) The district attorney may, with the consent of the Commissioners Court of Leon County, appoint a deputy district attorney.

(d) The Commissioners Court of Leon County shall pay the salary and traveling expenses of the deputy district attorney from the officers' salary fund. The salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments and expense claims shall be paid at the end of each month. The salary is subject to participation fully in the Texas County and District Retirement System.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 24, eff. Jan. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 226, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Redesignated and amended from Government Code, Section 43.106 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1059 (H.B. 3153), Sec. 1.01(c), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 43.182. DISTRICT ATTORNEY FOR KLEBERG AND KENEDY COUNTIES. (a) The voters of Kleberg and Kenedy Counties elect a district attorney. The district attorney has the same powers and duties as other district attorneys and serves the district courts of Kleberg and Kenedy Counties.

(b) The district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district courts of Kleberg and Kenedy Counties and shall represent the state in criminal cases pending in those courts. The district attorney has control of any case heard on petition of writ of habeas corpus before any district or inferior court in the district.

(c) The commissioners courts of the counties comprising the district may supplement the state salary of the district attorney. The amount of the supplement may not exceed $12,000 a year. The supplemental salary must be paid proportionately by the commissioners court of each county according to the population of the county. The supplemental salary may be paid from the officers' salary fund of a county. If that fund is inadequate, the commissioners court may transfer the necessary funds from the general fund of the county.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 43.183. 506TH JUDICIAL DISTRICT. (a) The voters of Grimes County elect a district attorney for the 506th Judicial District who represents the state only in that county.

(b) The district attorney shall attend each term and session of the district courts and all other courts, except municipal courts, in Grimes County and, unless otherwise provided by law, shall exclusively represent the state in all criminal matters in those courts.

(c) The district attorney has no power, duty, or privilege relating to family law and juvenile matters, including matters involving children's protective services, protective orders under Chapter 71, Family Code, orders under Chapter 159, Family Code, proceedings under Title 3, Family Code, civil commitment matters under Subtitle C, Title 7, Health and Safety Code, or a quo warranto or removal case, except, that if the county attorney fails or refuses to act in a quo warranto or removal case, the district attorney has the power, duty, and privilege to bring a removal of quo warranto action.

(d) The district attorney has no power, duty, or privilege in any civil matter pending before any court.

(e) The district attorney must be at least 30 years of age, must have been a practicing attorney in this state for at least five years, and must have been a resident of Grimes County for at least the time required under Section 141.001, Election Code.

(f) The district attorney may not engage in the private practice of law.

(g) The district attorney may, for the purpose of conducting the affairs of the office, appoint assistant district attorneys, investigators, and other necessary staff. The salaries of the members of the staff of the district attorney's office shall be paid from the officer's salary fund of the county with the approval of the commissioners court.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 704, Sec. 25, eff. Jan. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 7.29, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 9(i), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Government Code, Section 43.1745 and amended by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1951), Sec. 9(j), eff. September 1, 2008.

Sec. 43.184. 452ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of the 452nd Judicial District elect a district attorney who represents the state in all matters before that district court.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1059 (H.B. 3153), Sec. 1.03(d), eff. September 1, 2013.